Massachusetts, session 194th, S1291.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Definitions. For the purposes of this section, the following words and
phrases shall have the following meanings:
A. “Employee”, any person who renders services to an employer, contractor, or any other
entity and receives compensation for those services, including full- and part-time paid
employees, temporary employees, contracted employees, and independent contractors.
B. “Employer”, a person or entity of any size who obtains services from a full- or part-
time paid employee, temporary employee, contracted employee, or independent contractor and
hires at least one employee for any compensation.
C. “Representative employee”, an employee in a leadership, management, or legal
position whose responsibility is to advise on, oversee, and/or enforce organizational policies.
SECTION 2. Workplace Bullying Regulation.
of 5

A. Workplace bullying shall be unlawful. Workplace bullying is unwelcome, degrading,
and dehumanizing conduct that is severe or pervasive enough to create a work environment that
a reasonable person would consider toxic, hostile, or abusive. Workplace bullying may be
perpetrated by one or more persons. It does not include petty slights, annoyances, and isolated
incidents unless serious. Factors to be considered in determining whether workplace bullying
exists include but are not limited to the nature, frequency, and duration of the conduct and the
context in which the conduct occurs. Workplace bullying is found by a review of the totality of
the circumstances.
B. Employers and representative employees shall take all reasonable preventative and
responsive measures to provide safe work environments free from bullying by:
a. Acknowledging and responding to complaints of bullying within a reasonable time
frame appropriate to the level of urgency;
b. Providing and executing a transparent, timely complaint process that includes a
legitimate, fair, fact-finding investigation and the issuance of timely and accurate reports of
findings;
c. Providing and executing a transparent disciplinary process according to the severity of
the offense within a reasonable time frame, if applicable, including but not limited to: coaching,
counseling, a warning, or other disciplinary action, including removal of supervisory duties
and/or termination;
d. Maintaining accurate records of complaints, findings, and discipline;
of 5

e. Writing, distributing, posting, and otherwise providing a written preventative policy
against all forms of bullying, to include an anti-retaliation policy and an identification and
description of all reporting methods, consistent with this section and all other laws within 90
days. Such policies shall be distributed to employees on a regular basis.
f. Training all employees on such preventative and reporting policies.
C. It shall be unlawful for an employer or representative employee to:
a. Mandate, offer, or use mediation and/or arbitration of a bullying complaint prior to the
employee’s retaining of counsel,
b. Mandate, offer, or use a non-disclosure or non-disparagement agreement related to a
bullying complaint, and/or
c. Engage in an adverse employment action. An adverse employment action occurs when
an employee opposes an unlawful employment practice and/or exercises a right under 1 this
section and is then the target of forced resignation, termination, demotion, unfavorable
reassignment, failure to promote, disciplinary action, reduction in compensation, constructive
discharge, or a similar action.
A violation or violations of any part of this section can be enforced by a private right of
action against an individual employee and/or employer in violation of this Act.
SECTION 3. Damages. Complainants who prove a violation of section 2 or any of its
subparts shall be entitled to all remedies necessary to make such complainants whole. Remedies
shall include but not be limited to:
of 5

A. Compensatory damages to include economic (back pay and front pay and/or related
medical expenses) and non-economic (pain, suffering, and/or distress);
B. Punitive damages when a violation is extreme and/or egregious;
C. Injunctive relief whereby the court may enjoin the defendant from engaging in the
unlawful employment practice and may order any other relief deemed appropriate (reinstatement
of work and/or removal of the bullying employee from the complainant’s work environment
and/or removal of supervisory duties or termination of said employee);
D. Restorative measures (correction of reputational damage including false statements
made, the disciplinary record, and/or performance evaluations of the complainant and/or public
notification of the case without disclosing the plaintiff’s name if desired by the plaintiff).
In instances where the employer violates section 2B(e and/or f), the penalty shall not
exceed $100 for each offense.
In all other instances, the complainant shall receive the greater of all damages as
identified above or $5,000 per violation of section 2A, 2B, and/or 2C for a maximum of $15,000.
The at-fault party shall pay the plaintiff’s reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs. A
prevailing employer shall not be awarded fees and costs.
SECTION 4. Employee Rights
A. Any person who has a cause of action under the provisions of this Act shall have a
period of three (3) years after the last violation of Section 2 of this Act to file said cause of
action.
of 5

B. A pseudonym can be used in any and all instances at the plaintiff’s request.
of 5